Utah statutes.
26-4-10.   Certification of cause of death.

The certification of the cause of death under any of the circumstances listed in Section 26-4-7 shall only be made by the medical examiner or his designated representative.  Certification of the cause of death or signature on the certificate of death by any other person is a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

